Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1057.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 16-504, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 16, chapter 4, article 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section 16-504, to read: START_STATUTE16-504. Antifraud ballot paper; vendor certification; antifraud measures Notwithstanding any other statute, any vendor that provides fraud countermeasures that are contained in and on the paper used for ballots shall be ISO 27001 certified, ISO 17025 certified or ISO 9001:2015 certified.  Ballot fraud countermeasures shall include the use of at least three of the following: 1. Unique, controlled-supply watermarked clearing bank specification 1 security paper. 2. Secure holographic foil that acts as a visual deterrent and anti-copy feature. 3. Branded overprint of any hologram that personalizes the hologram with customer logo. 4. Custom complex security background designs with banknote-level security. 5. Secure variable digital infill. 6. Thermochromic, tri-thermochromic, photochromic or optically variable inks. 7. Stealth numbering in ultraviolet, infrared or taggant inks. 8. Multicolored micro-numismatic invisible ultraviolet designs. 9. Unique forensic fraud detection technology that is built into security inks. 10. Unique bar code or QR code that is accessible only to the voter and that tracks the voter's ballot as it is processed. END_STATUTE